src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Biblii+N+Prop:Bibli PROP_STIPENDII  "Raamattu" ;
Afanasjev+N+Prop:Afanasjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Akimov+N+Prop:Akimov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Aleksandr+N+Prop:Aleksandr PROP_TAIGIN  "Aleksandr" ;
Aleksandrov+N+Prop:Aleksandrov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Aleksejev+N+Prop:Aleksejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Aleksejev+N+Prop:Aleksejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Alevtin+N+Prop:Alevtin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Alʼfin+N+Prop:Alʼfin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Anatolii+N+Prop:Anatoli PROP_KONDII  "Anatoli" ;
Anatoljev+N+Prop:Anatoljev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Andrejev+N+Prop:Andrejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Anikin+N+Prop:Anikin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Antonov+N+Prop:Antonov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Anus+N+Prop:Anuks PROP_ALUS  "Aunus" ;
Avgustov+N+Prop:Avgustov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Baburov+N+Prop:Baburov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Barbašin+N+Prop:Barbašin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Barmin+N+Prop:Barmin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Belʼakov+N+Prop:Belʼakov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Berezin+N+Prop:Berezin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Biblii+N+Prop:Bibli PROP_KONDII  "Raamattu" ;
Bobin+N+Prop:Bobin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Bondarev+N+Prop:Bondarev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Borisov+N+Prop:Borisov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Bukin+N+Prop:Bukin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Cikin+N+Prop:Cikin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Cuburov+N+Prop:Cuburov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Digujev+N+Prop:Digujev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Dmitrii+N+Prop:Dmitri PROP_KONDII  "Dmitri" ;
Dmitrijev+N+Prop:Dmitrijev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Domantov+N+Prop:Domantov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Dubinin+N+Prop:Dubinin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Fedotov+N+Prop:Fedotov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fedulov+N+Prop:Fedulov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Fodorov+N+Prop:Fodorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fokin+N+Prop:Fokin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Fomin+N+Prop:Fomin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Fʼodorov+N+Prop:Fʼodorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fʼoudorov+N+Prop:Fʼoudorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gagarin+N+Prop:Gagarin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Gavrilov+N+Prop:Gavrilov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gdaljev+N+Prop:Gdaljev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Genrihov+N+Prop:Genrihov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gerasimov+N+Prop:Gerasimov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ginijatullin+N+Prop:Ginijatullin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Gorohov+N+Prop:Gorohov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Grigorjev+N+Prop:Grigorjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Grigorjev+N+Prop:Grigorjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Grišin+N+Prop:Grišin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Gukkin+N+Prop:Gukkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Haritonov+N+Prop:Haritonov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Heikkijev+N+Prop:Heikkijev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Hristos+N+Prop:Hristos PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Hudilainen+N+Prop:Hudila PROP_KARJALAINE  "Hudilainen" ;
Hvatov+N+Prop:Hvatov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ignatjev+N+Prop:Ignatjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Iisus+N+Prop:Iisus PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Ilʼjin+N+Prop:Ilʼjin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Ipatov+N+Prop:Ipatov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ivan+N+Prop:Ivan PROP_TAIGIN  "Ivan" ;
Ivanov+N+Prop:Ivanov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jakovlev+N+Prop:Jakovlev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jakovlev+N+Prop:Jakovlev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Jegorov+N+Prop:Jegorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jegorov+N+Prop:Jegorov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Jegov+N+Prop:Jegov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jelagin+N+Prop:Jelagin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Jevangelii+N+Prop:Jevangeli PROP_KONDII  "Evankeliumi" ;
Jevgenjev+N+Prop:Jevgenjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Jevstratov+N+Prop:Jevstratov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Judin+N+Prop:Judin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Jumal+N+Prop:Jumal PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Jurjev+N+Prop:Jurjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Karakin+N+Prop:Karakin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Karjal+N+Prop:Karjal PROP_TAIGIN  "Karjala" ;
Karkavin+N+Prop:Karkavin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Karlov+N+Prop:Karlov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Karpov+N+Prop:Karpov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kačalkin+N+Prop:Kačalkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kimov+N+Prop:Kimov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Klejerov+N+Prop:Klejerov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Klementjev+N+Prop:Klementjev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Kokorin+N+Prop:Kokorin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kondartjev+N+Prop:Kondartjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kononihin+N+Prop:Kononihin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kononov+N+Prop:Kononov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kopanʼov+N+Prop:Kopanʼov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Korobočkin+N+Prop:Korobočkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kovalʼov+N+Prop:Kovalʼov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Koškin+N+Prop:Koškin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Krilov+N+Prop:Krilov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kulakov+N+Prop:Kulakov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Kuzʼmin+N+Prop:Kuzʼmin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Kvirinii+N+Prop:Kvirini PROP_KONDII  "Kyrenius" ;
Lagotskaja-Mahajev+N+Prop:Lagotskaja-Mahajev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Lapin+N+Prop:Lapin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Lenin+N+Prop:Lenin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Leonidov+N+Prop:Leonidov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Leontjev+N+Prop:Leontjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Lizlov+N+Prop:Lizlov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Lopuhin+N+Prop:Lopuhin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Lukin+N+Prop:Lukin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Lʼovkin+N+Prop:Lʼovkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Makejev+N+Prop:Makejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Markov+N+Prop:Markov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Matvejev+N+Prop:Matvejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Matvejev-Terentjev+N+Prop:Matvejev-Terentjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Merkojev+N+Prop:Merkojev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Messii+N+Prop:Messi PROP_KONDII  "Messias" ;
Mihailov+N+Prop:Mihailov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Mihnev+N+Prop:Mihnev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Mimmijev+N+Prop:Mimmijev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Mišin+N+Prop:Mišin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Morozov+N+Prop:Morozov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Mrikin+N+Prop:Mrikin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Muhortikov+N+Prop:Muhortikov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Muraškin+N+Prop:Muraškin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Nifantjev+N+Prop:Nifantjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Nikitin+N+Prop:Nikitin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Nikolajev+N+Prop:Nikolajev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Ognev+N+Prop:Ognev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Ohapkin+N+Prop:Ohapkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Olʼkin+N+Prop:Olʼkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Onegin+N+Prop:Onegin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Osipov+N+Prop:Osipov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Pankratjev+N+Prop:Pankratjev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Pavlov+N+Prop:Pavlov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Paškov+N+Prop:Paškov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Petrov+N+Prop:Petrov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Petrunin+N+Prop:Petrunin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Polikarpov+N+Prop:Polikarpov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Polʼakov+N+Prop:Polʼakov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Popov+N+Prop:Popov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Portretov+N+Prop:Portretov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Potahin+N+Prop:Potahin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Pozdnʼakov+N+Prop:Pozdnʼakov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Prokopenkov+N+Prop:Prokopenkov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Puškin+N+Prop:Puškin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Redkin+N+Prop:Redkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Redʼkin+N+Prop:Redʼkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Remšujev+N+Prop:Remšujev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Romanov+N+Prop:Romanov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Saburov+N+Prop:Saburov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Sažin+N+Prop:Sažin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Semakov+N+Prop:Semakov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Semʼonov+N+Prop:Semʼonov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Serafin+N+Prop:Serafin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Sergejev+N+Prop:Sergejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Sidorov+N+Prop:Sidorov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Sirkin+N+Prop:Sirkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Skomorošin+N+Prop:Skomorošin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Smolin+N+Prop:Smolin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Spitsin+N+Prop:Spitsin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Stankev+N+Prop:Stankev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Stepanov+N+Prop:Stepanov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Stroganov+N+Prop:Stroganov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Tiirin+N+Prop:Tiirin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Timofejev+N+Prop:Timofejev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Timofejev+N+Prop:Timofejev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Tʼurin+N+Prop:Tʼurin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Urbanov+N+Prop:Urbanov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Usatov+N+Prop:Usatov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Vasiljev+N+Prop:Vasiljev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Veršinin+N+Prop:Veršinin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Viktorov+N+Prop:Viktorov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Vitaljev+N+Prop:Vitaljev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Vladimirov+N+Prop:Vladimirov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Vlasov+N+Prop:Vlasov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Wikipedii+N+Prop:Wikipedi PROP_KONDII  "Wikipedia" ;
Zaharov+N+Prop:Zaharov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Zvezdin+N+Prop:Zvezdin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Čuprov+N+Prop:Čuprov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
